Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.50.070

Protection of health care patients and providers.

A court having jurisdiction over a criminal or civil proceeding under this chapter shall take all steps reasonably necessary to safeguard the individual privacy and prevent harassment of a health care patient or health care provider who is a party or witness in a proceeding, including granting protective orders and orders in limine.

[ 1993 c 128 s 9.]